Illinois, session 104th, HB4480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 522-85.5 and 22-94 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-85.5)7    Sec. 22-85.5. Sexual misconduct in schools.8    (a) This Section applies beginning on July 1, 2022. 9    (b) The General Assembly finds that:10        (1) the success of students in school relies on safe 11    learning environments and healthy relationships with 12    school personnel;13        (2) it is important for staff to maintain a 14    professional relationship with students at all times and 15    to define staff-student boundaries to protect students 16    from sexual misconduct by staff and staff from the 17    appearance of impropriety;18        (3) many breaches of staff-student boundaries do not 19    rise to the level of criminal behavior but do pose a 20    potential risk to student safety;21        (4) repeated violations of staff–student boundaries 22    can indicate the grooming of a student for sexual abuse;23        (5) it is necessary to uphold the State Board of   HB4480- 2 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1    Education's Code of Ethics for Illinois Educators and for 2    each school district, charter school, or nonpublic school 3    to have an employee code of professional conduct policy;4        (6) each school district, charter school, or nonpublic 5    school must have the ability to discipline educators for 6    breaches of its employee code of professional conduct 7    policy;8        (7) each school district, charter school, or nonpublic 9    school must have the ability to know if any of its 10    educators have violated professional staff–student 11    boundaries in previous employment; and12        (8) as bystanders, educators may have knowledge of 13    concerning behaviors that no one else is aware of, so they 14    need adequate training on sexual abuse, the employee code 15    of professional conduct policy, and federal and State 16    reporting requirements. 17    (c) In this Section, "sexual misconduct" means any act, 18including, but not limited to, any verbal, nonverbal, written, 19or electronic communication or physical activity, by an 20employee or agent of the school district, charter school, or 21nonpublic school with direct contact with a student that is 22directed toward or with a student to establish a romantic or 23sexual relationship with the student. Such an act includes, 24but is not limited to, any of the following: 25        (1) A sexual or romantic invitation.26        (2) Dating or soliciting a date.  HB4480- 3 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1        (3) Engaging in sexualized or romantic dialog.2        (4) Making sexually suggestive comments that are 3    directed toward or with a student.4        (5) Self-disclosure or physical exposure of a sexual, 5    romantic, or erotic nature.6        (6) A sexual, indecent, romantic, or erotic contact 7    with the student. 8    (d) To prevent sexual misconduct with students, each 9school district, charter school, or nonpublic school shall 10develop an employee code of professional conduct policy that 11addresses all of the following:12        (1) Incorporates the Code of Ethics for Illinois 13    Educators.14        (2) Incorporates the definition of "sexual misconduct" 15    in this Section.16        (3) Identifies the expectations for employees and 17    agents of the school district, charter school, or 18    nonpublic school regarding how to maintain a professional 19    relationship with students, including the expectations for 20    staff-student boundaries, recognizing the age and 21    developmental level of the students served, and 22    establishes guidelines for all of the following 23    situations: 24            (A) Transporting a student.25            (B) Taking or possessing a photo or a video of a 26        student.  HB4480- 4 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1            (C) Meeting with a student or contacting a student 2        outside of the employee's or agent's professional 3        role. 4        (4) References the employee reporting requirements 5    required under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 6    Act and under Title IX of the federal Education Amendments 7    of 1972.8        (5) References required employee training that is 9    related to child abuse and educator ethics that are 10    applicable under State and federal law. 11    (e) The employee code of professional conduct policy, 12guidelines established for all of the situations identified in 13paragraph (3) of subsection (d), and all available methods for 14how to report staff-student boundary violations within a 15school and to external agencies must be posted on the website, 16if any, of each school district, charter school, or nonpublic 17school and must be included in any staff, student, and or 18parent handbook provided by the school district, charter 19school, or nonpublic, nonsectarian elementary or secondary 20school. 21    (f) A violation of the employee code of professional 22conduct policy may subject an employee to disciplinary action 23up to and including dismissal from employment. Failure to 24report a violation of the employee code of professional 25conduct policy may subject an employee to disciplinary action 26up to and including dismissal from employment.   HB4480- 5 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1(Source: P.A. 102-676, eff. 12-3-21.) 2    (105 ILCS 5/22-94)3    Sec. 22-94. Employment history review.4    (a) This Section applies to all permanent and temporary 5positions for employment with a school or a contractor of a 6school involving direct contact with children or students.7    (b) In this Section:8    "Contractor" means firms holding contracts with any 9school, including, but not limited to, food service workers, 10school bus drivers, and other transportation employees, who 11have direct contact with children or students.12    "Direct contact with children or students" means the 13possibility of care, supervision, guidance, or control of 14children or students or routine interaction with children or 15students.16    "School" means a public or nonpublic elementary or 17secondary school.18    "Sexual misconduct" has the meaning ascribed to it in 19subsection (c) of Section 22-85.5 of this Code.20    (c) Prior to hiring an applicant to work directly with 21children or students, a school or contractor must ensure that 22the following criteria are met:23        (1) the school or contractor has no knowledge or 24    information pertaining to the applicant that would 25    disqualify the applicant from employment;  HB4480- 6 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1        (2) the applicant swears or affirms that the applicant 2    is not disqualified from employment;3        (3) using the template developed by the State Board of 4    Education, the applicant provides all of the following:5            (A) a list, including the name, address, telephone 6        number, and other relevant contact information of the 7        following:8                (i) the applicant's current employer if the 9            applicant has direct contact with children or 10            students at the applicant's current employer;11                (ii) all former employers of the applicant 12            that were schools or school contractors, as well 13            as all former employers at which the applicant had 14            direct contact with children or students;15            (B) A written authorization that consents to and 16        authorizes disclosure by the applicant's current and 17        former employers under subparagraph (A) of this 18        paragraph (3) of the information requested under 19        paragraph (4) of this subsection (c) and the release 20        of related records and that releases those employers 21        from any liability that may arise from such disclosure 22        or release of records pursuant to subsection (e).23            (C) A written statement of whether the applicant:24                (i) has been the subject of a sexual 25            misconduct allegation, unless a subsequent 26            investigation resulted in a finding that the   HB4480- 7 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1            allegation was false, unfounded, or 2            unsubstantiated;3                (ii) has ever been discharged from, been asked 4            to resign from, resigned from, or otherwise been 5            separated from any employment, has ever been 6            disciplined by an employer, or has ever had an 7            employment contract not renewed due to an 8            adjudication or finding of sexual misconduct or 9            while an allegation of sexual misconduct was 10            pending or under investigation, unless the 11            investigation resulted in a finding that the 12            allegation was false, unfounded, or 13            unsubstantiated; or14                (iii) has ever had a license or certificate 15            suspended, surrendered, or revoked or had an 16            application for licensure, approval, or 17            endorsement denied due to an adjudication or 18            finding of sexual misconduct or while an 19            allegation of sexual misconduct was pending or 20            under investigation, unless the investigation 21            resulted in a finding that the allegation was 22            false, unfounded, or unsubstantiated.23        (4) The school, or contractor, or regional office of 24    education or intermediate service center on behalf of a 25    school district, pursuant to paragraph (1.5) of subsection 26    (i), shall initiate a review of the employment history of   HB4480- 8 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1    the applicant by contacting those employers listed by the 2    applicant under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of this 3    subsection (c) and, using the template developed by the 4    State Board of Education, request all of the following 5    information:6            (A) the dates of employment of the applicant;7            (B) a statement as to whether the applicant:8                (i) has been the subject of a sexual 9            misconduct allegation, unless a subsequent 10            investigation resulted in a finding that the 11            allegation was false, unfounded, or 12            unsubstantiated;13                (ii) was discharged from, was asked to resign 14            from, resigned from, or was otherwise separated 15            from any employment, was disciplined by the 16            employer, or had an employment contract not 17            renewed due to an adjudication or finding of 18            sexual misconduct or while an allegation of sexual 19            misconduct was pending or under investigation, 20            unless the investigation resulted in a finding 21            that the allegation was false, unfounded, or 22            unsubstantiated; or23                (iii) has ever had a license or certificate 24            suspended, surrendered, or revoked due to an 25            adjudication or finding of sexual misconduct or 26            while an allegation of sexual misconduct was   HB4480- 9 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1            pending or under investigation, unless the 2            investigation resulted in a finding that the 3            allegation was false, unfounded, or 4            unsubstantiated.5            (C) The template shall include the following 6        option: if the employer does not have records or 7        evidence regarding the questions in items (i) through 8        (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of this 9        subsection (c), the employer may state that there is 10        no knowledge of information pertaining to the 11        applicant that would disqualify the applicant from 12        employment.13        (5) For applicants licensed by the State Board of 14    Education, the school district, charter school, or 15    nonpublic school shall verify the applicant's reported 16    previous employers with previous employers in the State 17    Board of Education's educator licensure database to ensure 18    accuracy.19    (d) An applicant who provides false information or 20willfully fails to disclose information required in subsection 21(c) shall be subject to discipline, up to and including 22termination or denial of employment.23    (e) No later than 20 days after receiving a request for 24information required under paragraph (4) of subsection (c), an 25employer who has or had an employment relationship with the 26applicant shall disclose the information requested. If the   HB4480- 10 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1employer has an office of human resources or a central office, 2information shall be provided by that office. The employer who 3has or had an employment relationship with the applicant shall 4disclose the information on the template developed by the 5State Board of Education. For any affirmative response to 6items (i) through (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) 7of or subsection (c), the employer who has or had an employment 8relationship with the applicant shall provide additional 9information about the matters disclosed and all related 10records.11    A school shall complete the template at time of separation 12from employment, or at the request of the employee, and 13maintain it as part of the employee's personnel file. If the 14school completes an investigation after an employee's 15separation from employment, the school shall update the 16information accordingly.17    Information received under this Section shall not be 18deemed a public record.19    A school or contractor who receives information under this 20subsection (e) may use the information for the purpose of 21evaluating an applicant's fitness to be hired or for continued 22employment and may report the information, as appropriate, to 23the State Board of Education, a State licensing agency, a law 24enforcement agency, a child protective services agency, 25another school or contractor, or a prospective employer.26    An employer, school, school administrator, regional office   HB4480- 11 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1of education or intermediate service center, or contractor who 2provides information or records about a current or former 3employee or applicant under this Section is immune from 4criminal and civil liability for the disclosure of the 5information or records, unless the information or records 6provided were knowingly false. This immunity shall be in 7addition to and not a limitation on any other immunity 8provided by law or any absolute or conditional privileges 9applicable to the disclosure by virtue of the circumstances or 10the applicant's consent to the disclosure and shall extend 11extent to any circumstances in which when the employer, 12school, school administrator, regional office of education or 13intermediate service center, or contractor in good faith 14shares findings of sexual misconduct with another employer.15    Unless the laws of another state prevent the release of 16the information or records requested or disclosure is 17restricted by the terms of a contract entered into prior to 18July 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-702) and 19notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, 20an employer, school, school administrator, contractor, or 21applicant shall report and disclose, in accordance with this 22Section, all relevant information, records, and documentation 23that may otherwise be confidential.24    (f) A school or contractor may not hire an applicant who 25does not provide the information required under subsection (c) 26for a position involving direct contact with children or   HB4480- 12 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1students.2    (g) Beginning on July 1, 2023 (the effective date of 3Public Act 102-702), a school or contractor may not enter into 4a collective bargaining agreement, an employment contract, an 5agreement for resignation or termination, a severance 6agreement, or any other contract or agreement or take any 7action that:8        (1) has the effect of suppressing information 9    concerning a pending investigation or a completed 10    investigation in which an allegation was substantiated 11    related to a report of suspected sexual misconduct by a 12    current or former employee;13        (2) affects the ability of the school or contractor to 14    report suspected sexual misconduct to the appropriate 15    authorities; or16        (3) requires the school or contractor to expunge 17    information about allegations or findings of suspected 18    sexual misconduct from any documents maintained by the 19    school or contractor, unless, after an investigation, an 20    allegation is found to be false, unfounded, or 21    unsubstantiated.22    (h) Any provision of an employment contract or agreement 23for resignation or termination or a severance agreement that 24is executed, amended, or entered into on or after July 1, 2023 25(the effective date of Public Act 102-702) and that is 26contrary to this Section is void and unenforceable.  HB4480- 13 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1    (i) For substitute employees, all of the following apply:2        (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1.5) of 3    this subsection (i), the The employment history review 4    required by this Section is required only prior to the 5    initial hiring of a substitute employee or placement on a 6    school's approved substitute list and shall remain valid 7    as long as the substitute employee continues to be 8    employed by the same school or remains on the school's 9    approved substitute list.10        (1.5) For a substitute teacher licensed under Section 11    21B-20 and seeking employment in more than one school 12    district, a school district's regional office of education 13    or intermediate service center may collect and share the 14    information and records under paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) 15    of subsection (c). A regional office of education's or 16    intermediate service center's participation in the 17    employment history review shall be limited to collecting 18    such information and records and sharing the information 19    and records with the school district or school districts. 20    A regional office of education or intermediate service 21    center may not use the information and records collected 22    for the purpose of evaluating a substitute teacher 23    applicant's fitness to be hired, and the school district 24    shall complete all aspects of the employment history 25    review process, unless otherwise agreed to with the 26    regional office of education or intermediate service   HB4480- 14 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1    center. The regional office of education or intermediate 2    service center is not responsible for the content or 3    completeness of the information or records shared by any 4    former employer or with the school district. A regional 5    office of education's or intermediate service center's 6    participation in the employment history review process 7    shall occur only prior to the initial hiring of a 8    substitute teacher by one of its member school districts 9    or prior to the initial placement of a substitute teacher 10    on the regional office of education's or intermediate 11    service center's approved substitute list. The employment 12    history review shall remain valid as long as the 13    substitute teacher continues to be employed by a school 14    district within the regional office of education's or 15    intermediate service center's jurisdiction or remains on 16    the regional office of education's or intermediate service 17    center's approved substitute list. A regional office of 18    education or intermediate service center participating in 19    the employment history review process shall promptly 20    provide the school district in which the substitute 21    teacher is seeking employment with the collected 22    information and records. If the regional office of 23    education or intermediate service center receives updated 24    employment history review information or records, the 25    information or records shall be shared with the applicable 26    school districts by the regional office of education or   HB4480- 15 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1    intermediate service center as provided in this Section. 2    If, at any time, a school district has information or 3    records that the school district would have immunity from 4    liability to share as part of an employment history 5    review, then the school district and its employees are 6    immune from liability on the same terms as provided in 7    subsection (e) if sharing such information or records with 8    the regional office of education or intermediate service 9    center that maintains the applicable approved substitute 10    list. 11        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1.5) of 12    this subsection (i), a A substitute employee seeking to be 13    added to another school's substitute list shall undergo an 14    additional employment history review under this Section. 15    Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1.5) or 16    paragraph (3) of this subsection (i) or in subsection (k), 17    the appearance of a substitute employee on one school's 18    substitute list does not relieve another school from 19    compliance with this Section.20        (3) An employment history review conducted upon 21    initial hiring of a substitute employee by a contractor or 22    any other entity that furnishes substitute staffing 23    services to schools shall satisfy the requirements of this 24    Section for all schools using the services of that 25    contractor or other entity.26        (4) A contractor or any other entity furnishing   HB4480- 16 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1    substitute staffing services to schools shall comply with 2    paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (j).3    (j) For employees of contractors, all of the following 4apply:5        (1) The employment history review required by this 6    Section shall be performed, either at the time of the 7    initial hiring of an employee or prior to the assignment 8    of an existing employee to perform work for a school in a 9    position involving direct contact with children or 10    students. The review shall remain valid as long as the 11    employee remains employed by the same contractor, even if 12    assigned to perform work for other schools.13        (2) A contractor shall maintain records documenting 14    employment history reviews for all employees as required 15    by this Section and, upon request, shall provide a school 16    for whom an employee is assigned to perform work access to 17    the records pertaining to that employee.18        (3) Prior to assigning an employee to perform work for 19    a school in a position involving direct contact with 20    children or students, the contractor shall inform the 21    school of any instance known to the contractor in which 22    the employee:23            (A) has been the subject of a sexual misconduct 24        allegation unless a subsequent investigation resulted 25        in a finding that the allegation was false, unfounded, 26        or unsubstantiated;  HB4480- 17 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1            (B) has ever been discharged, been asked to resign 2        from, resigned from, or otherwise been separated from 3        any employment, been removed from a substitute list, 4        been disciplined by an employer, or had an employment 5        contract not renewed due to an adjudication or finding 6        of sexual misconduct or while an allegation of sexual 7        misconduct was pending or under investigation, unless 8        the investigation resulted in a finding that the 9        allegation was false, unfounded, or unsubstantiated; 10        or11            (C) has ever had a license or certificate 12        suspended, surrendered, or revoked due to an 13        adjudication or finding of sexual misconduct or while 14        an allegation of sexual misconduct was pending or 15        under investigation, unless the investigation resulted 16        in a finding that the allegation was false, unfounded, 17        or unsubstantiated.18        (4) The contractor may not assign an employee to 19    perform work for a school in a position involving direct 20    contact with children or students if the school objects to 21    the assignment after being informed of an instance listed 22    in paragraph (3).23    (k) An applicant who has undergone an employment history 24review under this Section and seeks to transfer to or provide 25services to another school in the same school district, 26diocese, or religious jurisdiction, or to another school   HB4480- 18 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1established and supervised by the same organization is not 2required to obtain additional reports under this Section 3before transferring.4    (l) Nothing in this Section shall be construed:5        (1) to prevent a prospective employer from conducting 6    further investigations of prospective employees or from 7    requiring applicants to provide additional background 8    information or authorizations beyond what is required 9    under this Section, nor to prevent a current or former 10    employer from disclosing more information than what is 11    required under this Section;12        (2) to relieve a school, school employee, contractor 13    of the school, or agent of the school from any legal 14    responsibility to report sexual misconduct in accordance 15    with State and federal reporting requirements;16        (3) to relieve a school, school employee, contractor 17    of the school, or agent of the school from any legal 18    responsibility to implement the provisions of Section 7926 19    of Chapter 20 of the United States Code; or20        (4) to prohibit the right of the exclusive bargaining 21    representative under a collective bargaining agreement to 22    grieve and arbitrate the validity of an employee's 23    termination or discipline for just cause.24    (m) The State Board of Education shall develop the 25templates required under paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection 26(c).  HB4480- 19 -LRB104 18024 LNS 31463 b1(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)